New Jersey, session 221, S3789.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 10 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 49 Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation STATE AID 08-3380  Farmland Preservation ......................................... $8,000,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation                                                                             $8,000,000 State Aid: 08    County of Monmouth - Open Space and Farmland Preservation Trust Fund (PTRF)................................................. ($8,000,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated to the County of Monmouth - Open Space and Farmland Preservation Trust Fund shall be utilized for the permanent preservation of the Stein farmland property in Upper Freehold Township. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.